Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.030

Mandatory duties of code city officers.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, every officer of a code city shall perform, in the manner provided, all duties of his or her office which are imposed by state law on officers of every other class of city who occupy a like position and perform like functions.

[ 2009 c 549 s 3031; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.030.]